North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-24.1 Medical Marijuana

19-24.1-01.
Definitions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means an advanced practice registered nurse defined under section 43-12.1-02.

“Allowable amount of usable marijuana” means the amount of usable marijuana a registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver may purchase in a thirty-day period under this chapter.

Except as provided under subdivision b:

During a thirty-day period, a registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than two and one-half ounces [70.87 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more than three ounces [85.05 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, if a registered qualifying patient has a registry identification card authorizing an enhanced allowable amount:

During a thirty-day period a registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than six ounces [170.01 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more than seven and one-half ounces [212.62 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

A registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than the maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period for a cannabinoid concentrate or medical cannabinoid product, or the cumulative total of both, is four thousand milligrams.

“Bona fide provider-patient relationship” means a treatment or counseling relationship between a health care provider and patient in which all the following are present:

The health care provider has reviewed the patient’s relevant medical records and completed a full assessment of the patient’s medical history and current medical condition, including a relevant, in-person, medical evaluation of the patient.

The health care provider has created and maintained records of the patient’s condition in accordance with medically accepted standards.

The patient is under the health care provider’s continued care for the debilitating medical condition that qualifies the patient for the medical use of marijuana.

The health care provider has a reasonable expectation that provider will continue to provide followup care to the patient to monitor the medical use of marijuana as a treatment of the patient’s debilitating medical condition.

The relationship is not for the sole purpose of providing written certification for the medical use of marijuana.

“Cannabinoid” means a chemical compound that is one of the active constituents of marijuana.

“Cannabinoid capsule” means a small, soluble container, usually made of gelatin, which encloses a dose of a cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid concentrate intended for consumption. The maximum concentration of amount of tetrahhydrocannabinol permitted in a serving of a cannabinoid capsule is fifty milligrams.

“Cannabinoid concentrate” means a concentrate or extract obtained by separating cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical, or other process.

“Cannabinoid edible product” means a food or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate or the dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis is incorporated.

“Cannabinoid solution” means a solution consisting of a mixture created from cannabinoid concentrate and other ingredients. A container holding a cannabinoid solution for dispensing may not exceed thirty milliliters.

“Cannabinoid topical” means a cannabinoid product intended to be applied to the skin or hair. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a cannabinoid topical is six percent.

“Cannabinoid transdermal patch” means an adhesive substance applied to the skin which contains a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate for absorption into the bloodstream. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a serving of a cannabinoid transdermal patch is fifty milligrams.

“Cardholder” means a qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or compassion center agent who has been issued and possesses a valid registry identification card.

“Compassion center” means a manufacturing facility or dispensary.

“Compassion center agent” means a principal officer, board member, member, manager, governor, employee, volunteer, or agent of a compassion center. The term does not include a lawyer representing a compassion center in civil or criminal litigation or in an adversarial administrative proceeding.

“Contaminated” means made impure or inferior by extraneous substances.

“Debilitating medical condition” means one of the following:

Cancer;

Positive status for human immunodeficiency virus;

Acquired immune deficiency syndrome;

Decompensated cirrhosis caused by hepatitis C;

Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis;

Posttraumatic stress disorder;

Agitation of Alzheimer’s disease or related dementia;

Crohn’s disease;

Fibromyalgia;

Spinal stenosis or chronic back pain, including neuropathy or damage to the nervous tissue of the spinal cord with objective neurological indication of intractable spasticity;

Glaucoma;

Epilepsy;

Anorexia nervosa;

Bulimia nervosa;

Anxiety disorder;

Tourette syndrome;

Ehlers-Danlos syndrome;

Endometriosis;

Interstitial cystitis;

Neuropathy;

Migraine;

Rheumatoid arthritis;

Autism spectrum disorder;

A brain injury;

A terminal illness; or

A chronic or debilitating disease or medical condition or treatment for such disease or medical condition that produces one or more of the following:

Cachexia or wasting syndrome;

Severe debilitating pain that has not responded to previously prescribed medication or surgical measures for more than three months or for which other treatment options produced serious side effects;

Intractable nausea;

Seizures; or

Severe and persistent muscle spasms, including those characteristic of multiple sclerosis.

“Department” means the state department of health.

“Designated caregiver” means an individual who agrees to manage the well-being of a registered qualifying patient with respect to the qualifying patient’s medical use of marijuana.

“Dispensary” means an entity registered by the department as a compassion center authorized to dispense usable marijuana to a registered qualifying patient and a registered designated caregiver.

“Enclosed, locked facility” means a closet, room, greenhouse, building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access limited to individuals authorized under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

“Health care provider” means a physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse.

“Manufacturing facility” means an entity registered by the department as a compassion center authorized to produce and process and to sell usable marijuana to a dispensary.

“Marijuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis; the seeds of the plant; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, the seeds of the plant, or the resin extracted from any part of the plant. The term marijuana does not include:

Hemp as regulated under section 4.1-18.1-01; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355].

“Maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol” means the total amount of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in a medical cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid concentrate.

“Medical cannabinoid product” means a product intended for human consumption or use which contains cannabinoids.

Medical cannabinoid products are limited to the following forms:

Cannabinoid solution;

Cannabinoid capsule;

Cannabinoid transdermal patch; and

Cannabinoid topical.

“Medical cannabinoid product” does not include:

A cannabinoid edible product;

A cannabinoid concentrate by itself; or

The dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis by itself.

“Medical marijuana product” means a cannabinoid concentrate or a medical cannabinoid product.

“Medical marijuana waste” means unused, surplus, returned, or out-of-date usable marijuana; recalled usable marijuana; unused marijuana; or plant debris of the plant of the genus cannabis, including dead plants and all unused plant parts and roots.

“Medical use of marijuana” means the acquisition, use, and possession of usable marijuana to treat or alleviate a qualifying patient’s debilitating medical condition.

“Minor” means an individual under the age of nineteen.

“North Dakota identification” means a North Dakota driver’s license or comparable state of North Dakota or federal issued photo identification card verifying North Dakota residence.

“Owner” means an individual or an organization with an ownership interest in a compassion center.

“Ownership interest” means an aggregate ownership interest of five percent or more in a compassion center, unless the interest is solely a security, lien, or encumbrance, or an individual who will be participating in the direction, control, or management of the compassion center.

“Pediatric medical marijuana” means a medical marijuana product containing cannabidiol which may not contain a maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol of more than six percent.

“Physician” means a physician licensed under chapter 43-17 to practice medicine in the state of North Dakota.

“Physician assistant” means an individual licensed under chapter 43-17 to practice as a physician assistant in the state.

“Posttraumatic stress disorder” means a patient meets the diagnostic criteria for posttraumatic stress disorder under the “Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders”, American psychiatric association, fifth edition, text revision (2013).

“Processing” or “process” means the compounding or conversion of marijuana into a medical marijuana product.

“Producing”, “produce”, or “production” mean the planting, cultivating, growing, trimming, or harvesting of the plant of the genus cannabis or the drying of the leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis.

“Qualifying patient” means an individual who has been diagnosed by a health care provider as having a debilitating medical condition.

“Registry identification card” means a document issued by the department which identifies an individual as a registered qualifying patient, registered designated caregiver, or registered compassion center agent.

“Substantial corporate change” means:

For a corporation, a change of ten percent or more of the officers or directors, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the stock of the corporation, or an existing stockholder obtaining ten percent or more of the stock of the corporation;

For a limited liability company, a change of ten percent or more of the managing members of the company, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company, or an existing member obtaining a cumulative of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company; or

For a partnership, a change of ten percent or more of the managing partners of the company, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company, or an existing member obtaining a cumulative of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company.

“Terminal illness” means a disease, illness, or condition of a patient:

For which there is not a reasonable medical expectation of recovery;

Which as a medical probability, will result in the death of the patient, regardless of the use or discontinuance of medical treatment implemented for the purpose of sustaining life or the life processes; and

As a result of which, the patient’s health care provider would not be surprised if death were to occur within six months.

“Tetrahydrocannabinol” means tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis, and synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant, including synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, including:

Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-6 or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers.

Tetrahydrocannabinol does not include:

The allowable amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol found in hemp as defined in chapter 4.1-18.1; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355].

“Total tetrahydrocannabinol” means the sum of the percentage by weight of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid multiplied by eight hundred seventy-seven thousandths plus the percentage of weight of tetrahydrocannabinol.

“Usable marijuana” means a medical marijuana product or the dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form. However, the term does not include a cannabinoid edible product. In the case of a registered qualifying patient who is a minor, “usable marijuana” is limited to pediatric medical marijuana.

“Verification system” means the system maintained by the department under section 19-24.1-31 for verification of registry identification cards.

“Written certification” means a form established by the department which is executed, dated, and signed by a health care provider within ninety calendar days of the date of application, stating the patient has a debilitating medical condition. A health care provider may authorize an enhanced amount of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form to treat or alleviate the patient’s debilitating medical condition of cancer. A written certification may not be made except in the course of a bona fide provider-patient relationship.

(Since nomenclature of these substances is not intentionally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation or atomic positions covered.)

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 61, § 3, effective March 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 191, §§
1, 2, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 192, § 1, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 1, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 9, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 93 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 9 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213.

Section 19-24.1-01 was amended 8 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417; Section 1 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417; Section 1 of Chapter 192, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1519; Section 3 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417; Section 1 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1119; Section 2 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1119; Section 1 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283; and Section 3 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1349.

19-24.1-01.
Definitions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means an advanced practice registered nurse defined under section 43-12.1-02.

“Allowable amount of usable marijuana” means the amount of usable marijuana a registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver may purchase in a thirty-day period under this chapter.

Except as provided under subdivision b:

During a thirty-day period, a registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than two and one-half ounces [70.87 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more than three ounces [85.05 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, if a registered qualifying patient has a registry identification card authorizing an enhanced allowable amount:

During a thirty-day period a registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than six ounces [170.01 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

At any time a registered qualifying patient, or a registered designated caregiver on behalf of a registered qualifying patient, may not possess more than seven and one-half ounces [212.62 grams] of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form.

A registered qualifying patient may not purchase or have purchased by a registered designated caregiver more than the maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a thirty-day period for a cannabinoid concentrate or medical cannabinoid product, or the cumulative total of both, is four thousand milligrams.

“Bona fide provider-patient relationship” means a treatment or counseling relationship between a health care provider and patient in which all the following are present:

The health care provider has reviewed the patient’s relevant medical records and completed a full assessment of the patient’s medical history and current medical condition, including a relevant, in-person, medical evaluation of the patient.

The health care provider has created and maintained records of the patient’s condition in accordance with medically accepted standards.

The patient is under the health care provider’s continued care for the debilitating medical condition that qualifies the patient for the medical use of marijuana.

The health care provider has a reasonable expectation that provider will continue to provide followup care to the patient to monitor the medical use of marijuana as a treatment of the patient’s debilitating medical condition.

The relationship is not for the sole purpose of providing written certification for the medical use of marijuana.

“Cannabinoid” means a chemical compound that is one of the active constituents of marijuana.

“Cannabinoid capsule” means a small, soluble container, usually made of gelatin, which encloses a dose of a cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid concentrate intended for consumption. The maximum concentration of amount of tetrahhydrocannabinol permitted in a serving of a cannabinoid capsule is fifty milligrams.

“Cannabinoid concentrate” means a concentrate or extract obtained by separating cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical, or other process.

“Cannabinoid edible product” means a food or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate or the dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis is incorporated.

“Cannabinoid solution” means a solution consisting of a mixture created from cannabinoid concentrate, and other ingredients. A container holding a cannabinoid solution for dispensing may not exceed thirty milliliters.

“Cannabinoid topical” means a cannabinoid product intended to be applied to the skin or hair. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a cannabinoid topical is six percent.

“Cannabinoid transdermal patch” means an adhesive substance applied to the skin which contains a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate for absorption into the bloodstream. The maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a serving of a cannabinoid transdermal patch is fifty milligrams.

“Cardholder” means a qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or compassion center agent who has been issued and possesses a valid registry identification card.

“Compassion center” means a manufacturing facility or dispensary.

“Compassion center agent” means a principal officer, board member, member, manager, governor, employee, volunteer, or agent of a compassion center. The term does not include a lawyer representing a compassion center in civil or criminal litigation or in an adversarial administrative proceeding.

“Contaminated” means made impure or inferior by extraneous substances.

“Debilitating medical condition” means one of the following:

Cancer;

Positive status for human immunodeficiency virus;

Acquired immune deficiency syndrome;

Decompensated cirrhosis caused by hepatitis C;

Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis;

Posttraumatic stress disorder;

Agitation of Alzheimer’s disease or related dementia;

Crohn’s disease;

Fibromyalgia;

Spinal stenosis or chronic back pain, including neuropathy or damage to the nervous tissue of the spinal cord with objective neurological indication of intractable spasticity;

Glaucoma;

Epilepsy;

Anorexia nervosa;

Bulimia nervosa;

Anxiety disorder;

Tourette syndrome;

Ehlers-Danlos syndrome;

Endometriosis;

Interstitial cystitis;

Neuropathy;

Migraine;

Rheumatoid arthritis;

Autism spectrum disorder;

A brain injury;

A terminal illness; or

A chronic or debilitating disease or medical condition or treatment for such disease or medical condition that produces one or more of the following:

Cachexia or wasting syndrome;

Severe debilitating pain that has not responded to previously prescribed medication or surgical measures for more than three months or for which other treatment options produced serious side effects;

Intractable nausea;

Seizures; or

Severe and persistent muscle spasms, including those characteristic of multiple sclerosis.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Designated caregiver” means an individual who agrees to manage the well-being of a registered qualifying patient with respect to the qualifying patient’s medical use of marijuana.

“Dispensary” means an entity registered by the department as a compassion center authorized to dispense usable marijuana to a registered qualifying patient and a registered designated caregiver.

“Enclosed, locked facility” means a closet, room, greenhouse, building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access limited to individuals authorized under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

“Health care provider” means a physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse.

“Manufacturing facility” means an entity registered by the department as a compassion center authorized to produce and process and to sell usable marijuana to a dispensary.

“Marijuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis; the seeds of the plant; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, the seeds of the plant, or the resin extracted from any part of the plant. The term marijuana does not include:

Hemp as inregulated under section 4.1-18.1-01; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355 ].

“Maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol” means the total amount of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in a medical cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid concentrate.

“Medical cannabinoid product” means a product intended for human consumption or use which contains cannabinoids.

Medical cannabinoid products are limited to the following forms:

Cannabinoid solution;

Cannabinoid capsule;

Cannabinoid transdermal patch; and

Cannabinoid topical.

“Medical cannabinoid product” does not include:

A cannabinoid edible product;

A cannabinoid concentrate by itself; or

The dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis by itself.

“Medical marijuana product” means a cannabinoid concentrate or a medical cannabinoid product.

“Medical marijuana waste” means unused, surplus, returned, or out-of-date usable marijuana; recalled usable marijuana; unused marijuana; or plant debris of the plant of the genus cannabis, including dead plants and all unused plant parts and roots.

“Medical use of marijuana” means the acquisition, use, and possession of usable marijuana to treat or alleviate a qualifying patient’s debilitating medical condition.

“Minor” means an individual under the age of nineteen.

“North Dakota identification” means a North Dakota driver’s license or comparable state of North Dakota or federal issued photo identification card verifying North Dakota residence.

“Owner” means an individual or an organization with an ownership interest in a compassion center.

“Ownership interest” means an aggregate ownership interest of five percent or more in a compassion center, unless the interest is solely a security, lien, or encumbrance, or an individual who will be participating in the direction, control, or management of the compassion center.

“Pediatric medical marijuana” means a medical marijuana product containing cannabidiol which may not contain a maximum concentration or amount of tetrahydrocannabinol of more than six percent.

“Physician” means a physician licensed under chapter 43-17 to practice medicine in the state of North Dakota.

“Physician assistant” means an individual licensed under chapter 43-17 to practice as a physician assistant in the state.

“Posttraumatic stress disorder” means a patient meets the diagnostic criteria for posttraumatic stress disorder under the “Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders”, American psychiatric association, fifth edition, text revision (2013).

“Processing” or “process” means the compounding or conversion of marijuana into a medical marijuana product.

“Producing”, “produce”, or “production” mean the planting, cultivating, growing, trimming, or harvesting of the plant of the genus cannabis or the drying of the leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis.

“Qualifying patient” means an individual who has been diagnosed by a health care provider as having a debilitating medical condition.

“Registry identification card” means a document issued by the department which identifies an individual as a registered qualifying patient, registered designated caregiver, or registered compassion center agent.

“Substantial corporate change” means:

For a corporation, a change of ten percent or more of the officers or directors, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the stock of the corporation, or an existing stockholder obtaining ten percent or more of the stock of the corporation;

For a limited liability company, a change of ten percent or more of the managing members of the company, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company, or an existing member obtaining a cumulative of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company; or

For a partnership, a change of ten percent or more of the managing partners of the company, or a transfer of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company, or an existing member obtaining a cumulative of ten percent or more of the ownership interest in the company.

“Terminal illness” means a disease, illness, or condition of a patient:

For which there is not a reasonable medical expectation of recovery;

Which as a medical probability, will result in the death of the patient, regardless of the use or discontinuance of medical treatment implemented for the purpose of sustaining life or the life processes; and

As a result of which, the patient’s health care provider would not be surprised if death were to occur within six months.

“Tetrahydrocannabinol” means tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis, and synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant, including synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, including:

Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-6 or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers.

Tetrahydrocannabinol does not include:

The allowable amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol found in hemp as defined in chapter 4.1-18.1; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355].

“Total tetrahydrocannabinol” means the sum of the percentage by weight of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid multiplied by eight hundred seventy-seven thousandths plus the percentage of weight of tetrahydrocannabinol.

“Usable marijuana” means a medical marijuana product or the dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form. However, the term does not include a cannabinoid edible product. In the case of a registered qualifying patient who is a minor, “usable marijuana” is limited to pediatric medical marijuana.

“Verification system” means the system maintained by the department under section 19-24.1-31 for verification of registry identification cards.

“Written certification” means a form established by the department which is executed, dated, and signed by a health care provider within ninety calendar days of the date of application, stating the patient has a debilitating medical condition. A health care provider may authorize an enhanced amount of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form to treat or alleviate the patient’s debilitating medical condition of cancer. A written certification may not be made except in the course of a bona fide provider-patient relationship.

(Since nomenclature of these substances is not intentionally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation or atomic positions covered.)

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 61, § 3, effective March 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 191, §§
1, 2, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 192, § 1, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 1, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 93, effective September 1, 2022.

19-24.1-02.
Medical marijuana program.

The department shall establish and implement a medical marijuana program under this chapter to allow for production and processing, the sale and dispensing of usable marijuana, and medical use of marijuana. A person may not produce or process or sell, possess, transport, dispense, or use marijuana or usable marijuana under the medical marijuana program unless the person is authorized to do so as a compassion center, a cardholder, or otherwise authorized by rule adopted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-03.
Qualifying patients — Registration.

A qualifying patient is not eligible to purchase, use, or possess usable marijuana under the medical marijuana program unless the qualifying patient has a valid registry identification card.

A qualifying patient application for a registry identification card is complete and eligible for review if an applicant submits to the department:

A nonrefundable application fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars.

An original written certification, which must include:

The name, address, and telephone number of the practice location of the applicant’s health care provider;

The health care provider’s North Dakota license number;

The health care provider’s medical or nursing specialty;

The applicant’s name and date of birth;

The applicant’s debilitating medical condition and the medical justification for the health care provider’s certification of the patient’s debilitating medical condition;

Attestation the written certification is made in the course of a bona fide provider-patient relationship ;

Whether the health care provider authorizes the patient to use an enhanced amount of the dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis in a combustible delivery form to treat or alleviate the patient's debilitating medical condition of cancer; and

The health care provider’s signature and the date.

An original qualifying patient application for a registry identification card form established by the department which must include all of the following:

The applicant’s name, address, and date of birth.

The name, address, and date of birth of the applicant’s proposed designated caregiver, if any.

A photographic copy of the applicant’s North Dakota identification. The North Dakota identification must be available for inspection and verification upon request of the department. If the applicant is a minor, a certified copy of a birth record or a photographic copy of the minor’s North Dakota identification is required.

The applicant’s or guardian’s signature and the date, or in the case of a minor, the signature of the minor’s parent or legal guardian with responsibility for health care decisions and the date.

A disclosure that possession of a firearm by a person who possesses marijuana may be a violation of federal law.

A signed consent for release of medical information related to the applicant’s debilitating medical condition, on a form provided by the department.

A recent two-by-two inch [5.08-by-5.08 centimeter] photograph of the applicant.

Any other information or material required by rule adopted under this chapter.

If the applicant is unable to submit the required application information due to age or medical condition, the individual responsible for making medical decisions for the applicant may submit the application on behalf of the applicant. The individual responsible for making medical decisions:

Must be identified on the qualifying patient application for a registry identification card; and

Shall provide a photographic copy of the individual’s department-approved identification. The identification must be available for inspection and verification upon the request of the department.

If the applicant is a minor, the department may waive the application or renewal fee if:

The parent or legal guardian of the applicant is the applicant’s registered designated caregiver; and

The applicant resides with the applicant’s registered designated caregiver.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 4, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 191, § 3, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 2, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 10, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-03 was amended 3 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1119; Section 4 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417; and Section 2 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283.

19-24.1-03.1.
Qualifying patients — Veterans.

In lieu of the written certification required under section 19-24.1-03, a veteran receiving treatment from a federal veterans’ affairs entity may submit to the department a copy of the veterans’ affairs medical records identifying a diagnosis of a debilitating medical condition and a copy of military discharge documents. The department may use the medical records and discharge documents in place of a written certification to approve or deny the application under section 19-24.1-05. The department shall issue a registry identification card within thirty calendar days of approving an application under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 193, § 3, effective April 24, 2019.